Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1710
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, with the passage of the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Public Law 104-193, the Department of Health and Human Services implement the Welfare Reform Act in a manner consistent with federal law.

Laws 1997, LB 864, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB351, § 5.